morphophonology/foma/aspectpref.lexc
!aspect marking only allowed on verbal stems
LEXICON Root
! optional partitive can come before the aspect prefixes
! david says this doesn't only attach to verbs (the partitive)
! but I'm waiting for the example
ʔiɬ-       #; ! prtv
           #;
Rest;


LEXICON Rest
ʔu-        #;! pfv
ʔas-       #;! stat
ləcu-      #;! continuous
ləs-       #;! prog.stat 
